test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-nekalcj_gt-norm.yaml
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалцахаюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалцахаюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалцян
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалцяд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалцяда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалцяниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалцядиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалцядиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалцянаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалцядаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалцядоʼ      
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: нэкалмэдмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: нэкалмэн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: нэкалмы
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: нэкалмэниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: нэкалмэдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: нэкалмэхэʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: нэкалмэваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: нэкалмэдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: нэкалмыˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалмэв
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалмэр
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалмэда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалмэмиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалмэриʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалмэдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалмэваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалмэраˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалмэдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалмын
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалмыд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалмыда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалмыниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалмыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалмыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалмынаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалмыдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалмыдоʼ   
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: нэкалмэдамзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: нэкалмэнась 
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [нэкалмысь, нэкалмэсь]
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: нэкалмэнинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: нэкалмэдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: нэкалмэханзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: нэкалмэваць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: нэкалмэдаць 
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [нэкалмыць, нэкалмэць]   
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалмэвась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалмэрась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалмэдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалмэминзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалмэринзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалмэдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалмэваць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалмэраць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалмэдонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюнась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюнинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюнаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюдаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалмэхэюдонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалмынась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалмыдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалмыдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалмынинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалмыдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалмыдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалмынаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалмыдаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалмыдонзь 
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1: нэкалтакэдмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2: нэкалтакэн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3: нэкалтакы
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1: нэкалтакэниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2: нэкалтакэдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3: нэкалтакэхэʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1: нэкалтакэваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2: нэкалтакэдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3: нэкалтакыˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалтакэв
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалтакэр
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалтакэда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалтакэмиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалтакэриʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалтакэдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалтакэваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалтакэраˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалтакэдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалтакын
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалтакыд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалтакыда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалтакыниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалтакыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалтакыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалтакынаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалтакыдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалтакыдоʼ   
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1: нэкалтакэдамзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2: нэкалтакэнась 
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3: [нэкалтакысь, нэкалтакэсь]
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1: нэкалтакэнинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2: нэкалтакэдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3: нэкалтакэханзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1: нэкалтакэваць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2: нэкалтакэдаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3: [нэкалтакыць, нэкалтакэць]   
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалтакэвась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалтакэрась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалтакэдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалтакэминзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалтакэринзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалтакэдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалтакэваць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалтакэраць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалтакэдонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюнась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюнинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюнаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюдаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалтакэхэюдонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалтакынась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалтакыдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалтакыдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалтакынинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалтакыдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалтакыдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалтакынаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалтакыдаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалтакыдонзь     
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1: нэкалмэкэдмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2: нэкалмэкэн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3: нэкалмэкы
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1: нэкалмэкэниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2: нэкалмэкэдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3: нэкалмэкэхэʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1: нэкалмэкэваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2: нэкалмэкэдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3: нэкалмэкыˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалмэкэв
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалмэкэр
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалмэкэда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалмэкэмиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалмэкэриʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалмэкэдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалмэкэваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалмэкэраˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалмэкэдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалмэкэхэюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалмэкэхэюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалмэкэхэюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалмэкэхэюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалмэкэхэюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалмэкэхэюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалмэкэхэюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалмэкэхэюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалмэкэхэюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалмэкын
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалмэкыд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалмэкыда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалмэкыниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалмэкыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалмэкыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалмэкынаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалмэкыдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалмэкыдоʼ      
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1: нэкалцакэдмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2: нэкалцакэн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3: нэкалцакы
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1: нэкалцакэниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2: нэкалцакэдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3: нэкалцакэхэʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1: нэкалцакэваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2: нэкалцакэдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3: нэкалцакыˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалцакэв
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалцакэр
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалцакэда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалцакэмиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалцакэриʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалцакэдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалцакэваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалцакэраˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалцакэдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалцакэхэюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалцакэхэюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалцакэхэюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалцакэхэюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалцакэхэюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалцакэхэюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалцакэхэюнаˮ
